Georgia, session 2025_26, HB899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 17 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
transfer-on-death deeds, is amended by revising Code Section 44-17-2, relating to
requirements, as follows:
"44-17-2.
(a)(1) As used in this Code section, the term 'interested person' means any individual
designated by a grantor as a beneficiary will be considered as having direct and tangible
H. B. 899
- 1 -

LC 48 1618
interest in real estate for the purpose of requesting a copy of a certificate of death from
the Office of Vital Records.
(2) An interest in real estate may be titled in a transfer-on-death form by recording a
deed, signed by the record owner of the interest, designating a grantee beneficiary or
beneficiaries of the interest. Such deed shall transfer ownership of such interest upon to
each interested person once such interested person has accepted his or her individual
interest by filing the requisite affidavit as provided for in subsection (d) of this Code
section within nine months after the death of the record owner. A transfer-on-death deed
need not be supported by consideration, subject to the following conditions:
(A) A Form PT-61 shall not be filed with a transfer-on-death deed filed by the grantor;
(B) The grantor has the right to add alternate interested persons within the deed in case
a designated beneficiary either predeceases the grantor or dies during the acceptance
period before accepting the property;
(C) The grantor may convey a beneficiary interest to a living trust by naming the
trustee as a designated grantee beneficiary;
(D) The grantor shall not create a new trust by using a transfer-on-death deed;
(E) The grantor must have the same legal capacity required to enter into a contract in
order to execute a transfer-on-death deed; and
(F) The only time an attorney in fact can execute a transfer-on-death deed on behalf of
a grantor is when there has been a grant of specific authority contained within the
power of attorney to create or change a beneficiary designation.
(b) The signature, consent, or agreement of or notice to a grantee beneficiary or
beneficiaries of a transfer-on-death deed shall not be required for any purpose during the
lifetime of the record owner.
(c) A designated grantee beneficiary may accept real estate pursuant to a transfer-on-death
deed only on behalf of himself, herself, or a legal entity over which he or she has proper
authority. A beneficiary shall not accept such real estate on behalf of another designated
H. B. 899
- 2 -

LC 48 1618
beneficiary. However, if the designated beneficiary is a ward or minor, a legal guardian
or legal conservator may accept real estate pursuant to a transfer-on-death deed on behalf
of such ward or minor.
(c)(d) Each designated grantee beneficiary wishing to To accept real estate pursuant to a
transfer-on-death deed, a designated grantee beneficiary shall execute an affidavit
affirming:
(1) Verification of the record owner's death;
(2) Whether the record owner and the designated grantee beneficiary were married at the
time of the record owner's death; and
(3) A legal description of the real estate.
(d)(e) The designated grantee beneficiary shall attach a copy of the record owner's death
certificate to the affidavit provided for in subsection (c)(d) of this Code section. For a
record owner's death occurring on or after July 1, 2024, the designated grantee beneficiary
shall record such affidavit with a Form PT-61 and related documents with the office of the
clerk of superior court of the county where the real estate is located within nine months of
the record owner's death or the interest in the property shall revert to the deceased record
owner's estate; provided, however, that for a record owner's death occurring before July 1,
2024, such recording of the affidavit provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section and
related documents by the designated grantee beneficiary or beneficiaries shall not be
subject to the nine-month time limitation.
(f) A beneficiary affidavit recorded pursuant to this Code section before July 1, 2025, in
which one or more of the named beneficiaries of a transfer-on-death deed explicitly accepts
the interests being conveyed by the deed on behalf of all or some of the beneficiaries
named in the affidavit shall be effective to accept such interests if executed by at least one
of the named beneficiaries accepting such interests.
(g)(1) Until a property interest is accepted by a designated beneficiary, the personal
representative of a solvent estate is responsible for mortgage payments, property taxes,
H. B. 899
- 3 -

LC 48 1618
and any repairs that render the property in imminent danger of being destroyed until the
property interest is accepted. The estate is entitled to repayment of expenses incurred
during such time until the property interest is accepted and shall have a priority lien
against the property for any amount that is not repaid within one year after such
acceptance.
(2) If a property is subject to imminent danger of foreclosure, condemnation, or
destruction, the personal representative of an insolvent estate shall notify such designated
beneficiary that he or she has four months to accept the interest in the property. Should
such designated beneficiary fail to accept within that time period, the estate's personal
representative shall have the right to sell the property and pay off all debts, and the
remaining proceeds shall revert back to the estate.
(h) In any case where the requirements for acceptance of a property interest have not been
met, all defects can be cured within nine months so long as the affidavit and the death
certificate are filed in accordance with subsection (e) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising subsection (a) and by adding a new subsection
to Code Section 44-17-4, relating to revocation or amendment, as follows:
"(a) A record owner of an interest in real estate who has titled such interest in a
transfer-on-death deed form and designated a beneficiary or beneficiaries in the manner
provided in this chapter may revoke such designation of the grantee beneficiary or
beneficiaries at any time prior to the death of such record owner, by executing,
acknowledging, and recording in the office of the clerk of superior court of the county
where the real estate is located an instrument revoking such designation. The instrument
of revocation shall refer to the initial transfer-on-death deed, shall be signed by the record
owner or such record owner's duly authorized attorney-in-fact, and such signature shall be
attested by an officer as provided in Code Section 44-2-15 and attested by two one other
H. B. 899
- 4 -

LC 48 1618
witnesses witness. Such revocation may be included in another deed or other instrument
of conveyance that is recorded. The signature, consent, or agreement of or notice to the
designated grantee beneficiary or beneficiaries to the revocation shall not be required."
"(d) In any case where the grantor subsequently sells or conveys an interest in real estate
100 before such grantor's death or conveys an interest in real estate to such grantor's living trust,
101 or where the death of a sole designated beneficiary occurs before acceptance, the
102 transfer-on-death deed intended for conveyance to the designated grantee beneficiary is
103 rendered revoked."
104 SECTION 3.
105 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 44-17-5, relating to grantee
106 beneficiary rights and prior death of designated grantee beneficiary, as follows:
107 "44-17-5.
108 (a) A grantee beneficiary or the beneficiaries of a transfer-on-death deed shall take the
109 interest in real estate of the record owner at upon the acceptance of the interest within nine
110 months of the death of such record owner, free and clear of any claims or interest as to a
111 person who became the spouse of the record owner subsequent to the execution of the
112 transfer-on-death deed, subject to all recorded conveyances, assignments, contracts,
113 mortgages, liens, and security pledges made by the record owner or to which the record
114 owner was subject during the lifetime of such record owner, including, but not limited to,
115 any recorded executory contract of sale, option to purchase, lease, license, easement,
116 mortgage, deed of trust or lien, and to any interest conveyed by the record owner that is less
117 than all of the record owner's interest in the property; provided, however, that a
118 nonconsensual lien against the grantee beneficiary or beneficiaries shall not attach to the
119 property until the recording of the affidavit described in subsections (d) and (e) of Code
120 Section 44-17-2. A transfer-on-death deed takes precedence and priority over any petition
121 for year's support filed upon the death of the grantor.
H. B. 899
- 5 -

LC 48 1618
122 (b) If one or more of the designated grantee beneficiaries dies prior to the death of the
123 record owner, the transfer to those beneficiaries who predecease the record owner shall
124 lapse and shall be deemed revoked, and the lapsed interest shall be split evenly among the
125 remaining designated grantee beneficiaries who are living at the time of the death of the
126 record owner and shall not revert back to the estate. In the event the grantee beneficiary
127 or beneficiaries are designated in the deed to be joint tenants with right of survivorship, the
128 death of one or more of the designated grantee beneficiaries prior to the death of the record
129 owner shall not invalidate an otherwise validly created joint tenancy estate as to those
130 designated grantee beneficiaries who are living at the time of the death of the record
131 owner."
132 SECTION 4.
133 Chapter 3 of Title 53 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to year's support,
134 is amended by revising Code Section 53-3-5, relating to filing of petition, as follows:
135 "53-3-5.
136 (a) Except as provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 44-17-5, upon Upon the death
137 of any individual leaving an estate solvent or insolvent, the surviving spouse or a guardian
138 or other person acting in on behalf of the surviving spouse or in on behalf of a minor child
139 may file a petition for year's support in the probate court having jurisdiction over the
140 decedent's estate. If the petition is brought by a guardian acting on behalf of a minor child,
141 no additional guardian ad litem shall be appointed for such minor child unless ordered by
142 the court.
143 (b) The petition shall set forth, as applicable, the full name of the surviving spouse, the full
144 name and birthdate birth date of each surviving minor child, and a schedule of the property,
145 including household furniture, that the petitioner proposes to have set apart as year's
146 support. The petition shall describe fully and accurately any real property the petitioner
H. B. 899
- 6 -

LC 48 1618
147 proposes to have set apart as year's support with a legal description sufficient under the
148 laws of this state to pass title to the real property.
149 (c) A petition for year's support shall be filed within 24 months of the date of death of the
150 decedent."
151 SECTION 5.
152 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
153 without such approval.
154 SECTION 6.
155 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 899
- 7 -